Washington statutes.
RCW 11.44.085

Claims against personal representative included.

The naming or the appointment of any person as personal representative shall not operate as a discharge from any just claim which the testator or intestate had against the personal representative, but the claim shall be included in the inventory and appraisement and the personal representative shall be liable to the same extent as the personal representative would have been had he or she not been appointed personal representative.

[ 1997 c 252 s 46; 1965 c 145 s 11.44.085. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 97; RCW 11.44.030; RRS s 1467; prior: Code 1881 s 1449; 1860 p 63 s 5; 1854 p 277 s 60.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.